Utah statutes.
11-38-301.   LeRay McAllister Critical Land Conservation Program.
(1)  There is created a program entitled the "LeRay McAllister Critical Land
Conservation Program."
(2)  Funding for the program shall be a line item in the budget of the Quality
Growth Commission.  The line item shall be nonlapsing.
